Ohio, session 136, SB252.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 959.22 of the Revised Code be 3
enacted to read as follows: 4
Sec. 959.22. (A) As used in this section : 5
(1) "Licensed veterinarian" has the same meaning as in 6
section 4741.01 of the Revised Code. 7
(2) "Onychectomy" means a procedure in which a portion of 8
the paw of a cat is amputated or the claw of a cat is disabled, 9
including a procedure that is commonly referred to as declawing. 10
(3) "Partial digital amputation" means a procedure for the 11
excision of some or all of one or more of the phalanges of the 12
paw of a cat. 13
(4) "Phalangectomy" means a procedure for the excision of 14
one or more of the phalanges of the paw of a cat. 15
(5) "Tendonectomy" means a procedure in which the tendons 16
to the limbs, paws, or toes of a cat are cut or modified so that 17
the cat's claws cannot function normally. 18

S. B. No. 252 Page 2
As Introduced
(6) "Therapeutic purpose" means a purpose necessary to 19
address a physical medical condition of a cat, such as an 20
existing or recurring physical illness, infection, disease, 21
injury, or abnormal condition in a claw that compromises the 22
cat's health. "Therapeutic purpose" does not mean cosmetic or 23
aesthetic purposes or purposes of convenience in the keeping, 24
harboring, or handling of a cat. 25
(B)(1) No person, by any means, shall knowingly perform an 26
onychectomy, a partial digit amputation, a phalangectomy, a 27
tendonectomy, or any other procedure to alter a cat's toes, 28
claws, or paws to prevent the normal functioning of the cat's 29
toes, claws, or paws. 30
(2) Division (B)(1) does not apply to either of the 31
following: 32
(a) A procedure that is determined to be necessary for a 33
therapeutic purpose by a licensed veterinarian; 34
(b) A procedure that solely involves the trimming of a 35
nonviable claw husk or placing a nonpermanent nail cap on a cat. 36
(C) If a licensed veterinarian determines that a procedure 37
is necessary for a therapeutic purpose under division (B)(2)(a) 38
of this section, the licensed veterinarian, within ten business 39
days after performing the procedure, shall file a written 40
statement with the state veterinary medical licensing board that 41
includes all of the following: 42
(1) The purpose of the procedure, including a laboratory 43
pathology report confirming the pathology; 44
(2) Identifying information of the cat, including its 45
microchip number, if applicable, age, gender, markings, and a 46
photo of the cat's face; 47

S. B. No. 252 Page 3
As Introduced
(3) Identifying information of the cat's owner or keeper, 48
including the owner's current address and telephone number. 49
The licensed veterinarian shall provide a copy of the 50
written statement to the owner or keeper of the cat. 51
(D) The director of agriculture shall impose a civil 52
penalty against a person who violates division (B)(1) of this 53
section in an amount as follows: 54
(1) One thousand dollars on a first offense; 55
(2) One thousand five hundred dollars on a second offense; 56
(3) Two thousand five hundred dollars on a third and any 57
subsequent offense. 58
The director shall afford the person an opportunity for an 59
adjudication hearing under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to 60
challenge the director's determination that the person committed 61
such violation. 62